test/src/morphology/V-viskama63_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - viskama: # Verb (63) '/(eng) to throw /(fin) heittää' - partial paradigm
     viskama+V+Inf/mA: viskama
     viskama+V+Inf: viskadaq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: viska
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [viskat, viskadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: viskas
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: viskamiq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [viskatiq, viskat, viskadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: viskasõq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: [viska, viska-aiq, viskaq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg1: visada
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg2: [visatat, visatadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3: visatas
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl1: visatamiq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl2: [visatatiq, visatadõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3: visatasõq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prs+Oc+ConNeg: [visada, visada-aiq, visadaq]

     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: visksi
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [visksiq, visksit, visksidõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: visaś
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [visksimiq, visksi]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [visksitiq, visksiq, visksit, visksidõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: [visksiq, visksivaq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+ConNeg: [viska, viska-as, viskaq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg1: visadi
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg2: [visadiq, visatit, visatidõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3: visati
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl1: [visatimiq, visadi]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl2: [visatitiq, visadiq, visatit, visatidõq]
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3: visadiq
     viskama+V+Ind+Prt+Oc+ConNeg: [visada, visada-as, visada-s, visadaq]

     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: viskav
     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: viskava
     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Par: viskavat
     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: viskavahe
     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: viskavaq
     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: viskavidõ
     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Par: viskavit
     viskama+V+ActPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: viskavihe
                    
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: visatav
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Gen: visatava
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Par: visatavat
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Sg+Ill: visatavahe
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Nom: visatavaq
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Gen: visatavidõ
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Par: visatavit
     viskama+V+PssPrsPrc+Pl+Ill: visatavihe

     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Nom: visanuq
     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Gen: visanuq
     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Par: visanut
     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Sg+Ill: visanuhe
     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Nom: visanuq
     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Gen: [visanuidõ, visanuisi]
     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Par: [visanuid, visanuisi]
     viskama+V+ActPrtPrc+Pl+Ill: [visanuihe, visanuisihe]

     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Nom: visat
     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Gen: visadu
     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Par: visatut
     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Sg+Ill: visatuhe
     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Nom: visaduq
     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Gen: [visatuidõ, visatuisi]
     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Par: [visatuid, visatuisi]
     viskama+V+PssPrtPrc+Pl+Ill: [visatuihe, visatuisihe]
